Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1758YH (6) 91 ll/js H.F. 328 Section 1. Section 331.604, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Each county shall participate in the county land record 3 information system and shall comply with the policies and 4 procedures established by the governing board of upload data 5 and images of recorded documents to the county land record 6 information system. The county land record information system 7 shall allow for uploading from each countyâs recording software 8 provider. 9 Sec. 2. Section 331.604, subsection 3, paragraph b, 10 subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (a), (c), and (d), 11 Code 2025, are amended by striking the subparagraph divisions. 12 Sec. 3. Section 331.604, subsection 3, paragraph b, 13 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b), Code 2025, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 (b) Maintaining the statewide internet site and the county 16 land record information system dedicated to preserving and 17 maintaining public records . 18 Sec. 4. Section 331.604, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 19 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 d. The local government electronic transaction fund is 21 established in the office of the treasurer of state under the 22 control of the treasurer of state. Moneys deposited into the 23 fund are not subject to section 8.33 . Notwithstanding section 24 12C.7 , interest or earnings on moneys in the local government 25 electronic transaction fund shall be credited to the fund. 26 Moneys in the local government electronic transaction fund 27 are not subject to transfer, appropriation, or reversion to 28 any other fund, or any other use except as provided in this 29 subsection . On a monthly basis, the county treasurer shall 30 pay the fees deposited into the county recorderâs electronic 31 transaction fund to the treasurer of state for deposit into 32 the local government electronic transaction fund. Moneys 33 credited to the local government electronic transaction fund 34 are appropriated to the treasurer of state for the payment 35 -1- LSB 1758YH (6) 91 ll/js 1/ 3 H.F. 328 of claims approved by the governing board of the county land 1 record information system. Except as otherwise provided in 2 this subsection , expenditures from the fund shall be for the 3 purpose of planning and implementing electronic recording and 4 electronic transactions in each county, developing county 5 and statewide internet sites to provide electronic access 6 to records and information, and to pay the ongoing costs 7 of integrating and maintaining the statewide internet site 8 dedicated to preserving and maintaining public records . 9 Sec. 5. Section 331.604, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 10 following new subsection: 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. A board of supervisors or other 12 alternative form of county government may vote to adopt an 13 additional fee, not to exceed ten dollars per transaction, to 14 be paid to the recorder when filing or recording an instrument 15 in the recorderâs office pursuant to this section. 16